Florida, session 2026, HB4089.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund shall convey to the City Commission of
the City of Trenton, in fee simple, and for all uses as
permitted by law, the following described real property located
in Gilchrist County and more particularly described as follows:

The following described lands located in Section 16,
Township 10 South, Range 15 East, Gilchrist County,
Florida; being a portion of the Nature Coast State
Trail: Commence at the Southwest Corner of Section 16,
Township 10 South, Range 15 East, Gilchrist County,
Florida; thence North 01 degrees 17 minutes 17 seconds
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4089 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4089 2026 Legislature
West along the West line of said Section 16, 2683.47
feet to the South boundary of the Nature Coast State
Trail; thence continue North 01 degrees 17 minutes 17
seconds West along the West line of said Section 16,
165.48 feet to the North boundary of the Nature Coast
State Trail; thence along a curve concave to the
Northwest, having a radius of 1845.08 feet, an arc
length of 1269.49 feet, and a chord bearing and
distance of North 64 degrees 27 minutes 52 seconds
East, 1244.60 feet; thence North 44 degrees 45 minutes
13 seconds East, 202.54 feet along the North boundary
of the Nature Coast State Trail to the West right-of-
way line of NW 1st Street and the Point of Beginning;
thence continue North 44 degrees 45 minutes 13 seconds
East, 362.02 feet to the West right-of-way line of
State Road No. 49 (US Highway No. 129); thence along
the West right-of-way line of State Road No. 49, South
01 degrees 09 minutes 08 seconds East, 229.74 feet to
the South boundary of the Nature Coast State Trail;
thence along the South boundary of the Nature Coast
State Trail, South 44 degrees 45 minutes 13 seconds
West, 362.02 feet to the West right-of-way line of NW
1st Street; thence along the West right-of-way line of
NW 1st Street, North 01 degrees 09 minutes 08 seconds
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4089 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4089 2026 Legislature
West, 229.74 feet to the North boundary of the Nature
Coast State Trail and the Point of Beginning.

Section 2. (1) The City Commission of the City of Trenton
shall manage and protect the real property described in section
1 for public means and purposes, and ensure continued public
access and use of the adjacent Nature Coast State Trailhead and
its associated facilities.
(2) Any sale or disposition of the real property described
in section 1 by the City Commission of the City of Trenton will
result in ownership of the property reverting back to the Board
of Trustees of the Internal Trust Fund on behalf of the state.
Section 3. If the Division of Historical Resources within
the Department of State determines that the Trenton Train Depot
is eligible for or listed on the National Register of Historic
Places, or otherwise deemed historically significant under
chapter 267, Florida Statutes, the City of Trenton shall, within
90 days after taking title, initiate a cultural resource
assessment survey consistent with Rule 1A-46, Florida
Administrative Code. The scope of work and any resulting report
shall be provided to the Division of Historical Resources for
review and recordkeeping.
Section 4. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust fund shall convey the real property described
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4089 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4089 2026 Legislature
in section 1 to the City Commission of the City of Trenton
within 90 days after the effective date of this act.
Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4089 -00-er